Illinois, session 104th, HB3410.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by adding 5Section 18-184.25 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/18-184.25 new)7    Sec. 18-184.25. Cultural heritage abatement. Any qualified 8resident of a cultural district designated by the Department 9of Commerce and Economic Opportunity may petition the 10corporate authorities of any taxing district in which the 11person resides to abate up to one-half of the property tax 12levied against homestead property occupied as a primary 13residence by the qualified resident. As used in this Section, 14"qualified resident" means a person who (i) represents the 15culture indicated in the cultural district as threatened by 16displacement or who is a member of a protected class and (ii) 17can attest that the person is threatened by displacement due 18to rising property tax levies and inflated local property 19values caused by real estate speculation.